Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0606

Resignation of director.

A director may resign at any time by giving notice in a record to the limited cooperative association. Unless the notice states a later effective date, a resignation is effective when the notice is received by the association.

[ 2019 c 37 s 606.]